Oklahoma, session 2025, SB439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 328.15, as

last amended by Section 2, Chapter 46, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 328.15), is amended to read as follows:

Section 328.15. A. Pursuant to and in compliance with Article

I of the Administrative Procedures Act, the Board of Dentistry shall

have the power to formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules as may be

necessary to regulate the practice of dentistry in this state and to

implement and enforce the provisions of the State Dental Act.

Req. No. 1140 Page 1

B. The Board is authorized and empowered to:

1. Examine and test the qualifications of applicants for a

license or permit to be issued by the Board;

2. Affiliate by contract or cooperative agreement with another

state or combination of states for the purpose of conducting

simultaneous regional examinations of applicants for a license to

practice dentistry, dental hygiene, or a dental specialty;

3. Maintain a list of the name, current mailing address and

official address of all persons who hold a license or permit issued

by the Board;

4. Account for all receipts and expenditures of the monies of

the Board including annually preparing and publishing a statement of

receipts and expenditures of the Board for each fiscal year;

5. Within limits prescribed in the State Dental Act, set fees

and administrative penalties to be imposed and collected by the

Board as provided by rules;

6. Employ an Executive Director, legal counsel and other

advisors to the Board including advisory committees;

7. Investigate and issue investigative and other subpoenas,

pursuant to Article II of the Administrative Procedures Act;

8. Initiate individual proceedings and issue orders imposing

administrative penalties, pursuant to Article II of the

Administrative Procedures Act, against any dentist, dental

hygienist, dental assistant, oral maxillofacial surgery assistant,

Req. No. 1140 Page 2

dent al laboratory technician, or holder of a permit to operate a

dental laboratory who has violated the State Dental Act or the rules

of the Board;

9. Conduct, in a uniform and reasonable manner, inspections of

dental offices and dental laboratories and business records of

dental offices and dental laboratories;

10. Establish guidelines for courses of study necessary for

dental assistants, oral maxillofacial surgery assistants and, when

appropriate, issue permits authorizing dental assistants or oral

maxillofacial surgery assistants to perform expanded duties;

11. Establish continuing education requirements for dentists,

dental hygienists, dental assistants and oral maxillofacial surgery

assistants who hold permits issued by the Board;

12. Recognize the parameters and standards of care established

and approved by the American Dental Association or another

nationally recognized medical or dental association that establishes

guidelines for health care as it relates to dentistry. The Board

shall have the sole authority to determine scope of practice of

licensees considering these standards and guidelines;

13. Formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules, pursuant to Article

I of the Administrative Procedures Act, as may be necessary to

implement and enforce the provisions of the Oklahoma Dental

Mediation Act and to enforce all state and federal laws pertaining

to the use of diagnostic x-ray systems or other sources of radiation

Req. No. 1140 Page 3

used for treatment purposes that occur in a dental office including,

but not limited to, the Diagnostic X-Ray Facility Act;

14. Seek and receive advice and assistance of the Office of the

Attorney General of this state;

15. Promote the dental health and the education of dental

health of the people of this state;

16. Inform, educate, and advise all persons who hold a license

or permit issued by the Board, or who are otherwise regulated by the

Board, regarding the State Dental Act and the rules of the Board;

17. Affiliate with the American Association of Dental Boards as

an active member, pay regular dues, and send members of the Board as

delegates to its meetings;

18. Enter into contracts;

19. Acquire by purchase, lease, gift, solicitation of gift or

by any other manner, hold, encumber, and dispose of personal

property as is needed, maintain, use and operate or contract for the

maintenance, use and operation of or lease of any and all property

of any kind, real, personal or mixed or any interest therein unless

otherwise provided by the State Dental Act; provided, all contracts

for real property shall be subject to the provisions of Section 63

of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

20. Receive or accept the surrender of a license, permit, or

certificate granted to any person by the Board as provided in

Section 328.44b of this title; and

Req. No. 1140 Page 4

21. Take all other actions necessary to implement and enforce

the State Dental Act.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-1503, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 1-1503. A. The Except as provided by subsection C of

this section, the State Department of Health is hereby designated as

the official agency of the State of Oklahoma this state for all

regulatory activities pertaining to health and safety in the use of

diagnostic x-ray systems, and shall act as the coordinating agency

for the purpose of cooperating with other states, the United States

Public Health Service and other federal agencies in the

administration of programs relating to diagnostic x-ray systems,

available to the State of Oklahoma this state under federal laws;

and it shall encourage, participate in, and conduct studies,

investigations, training, research and demonstrations relating to

constructive uses of diagnostic x-ray systems and the prevention and

control of its associated harmful effects or unnecessary exposure,

the effects to health on exposure to x-rays, and related problems.

B. Nothing in the Diagnostic X-Ray Facility Act shall interfere

with the doctor-patient relationship of any licensed member of the

healing arts; nor shall anything in the Diagnostic X-Ray Facility

Act prohibit a licensed practitioner of the healing arts, or an

individual under the direction of such licensed practitioner, from

using x-rays or other sources of radiation and/or or fluoroscopes

Req. No. 1140 Page 5

for diagnostic, research or treatment purposes, as authorized under

the Practitioner’s Licensing Act practitioner’s licensing act,

provided the radiation devices and the related facilities of the

practitioner shall comply with the rules and regulations promulgated

under the provisions of the Diagnostic X-Ray Facility Act.

C. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the Board of

Dentistry shall have the power and duty to conduct all regulatory

activities pertaining to health and safety in the use of diagnostic

x-ray systems or other sources of radiation used for treatment

purposes that occur in a dental office. The Board shall gather and

submit data and statistics required by state and federal law to the

State Department of Health annually or as requested. The fee

schedule for inspections conducted by the Board under this

subsection shall not exceed the fee schedule set by the State

Commissioner of Health as of the effective date of this act for

inspections of diagnostic x-ray systems at diagnostic x-ray

facilities.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.



60-1-1140 DC 1/14/2025 3:51:27 PM









Req. No. 1140 Page 6